Louisiana, session 2026, HB1025.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:79(I) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§79. Violation of protective orders
* * *
I.(1) If a preliminary or permanent injunction or protective order was issued
pursuant to R.S. 9:361 et seq., R.S. 9:372, R.S. 46:2131 et seq., R.S. 46:2151, R.S.
46:2171 et seq., R.S. 46:2181 et seq., or Code of Civil Procedure Article 3604 or
3607.1, by a family court or other court having civil jurisdiction over a divorce
proceeding or other civil proceeding, it shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution
pursuant to this Section if all of the following occur:
(a) The person protected by the protective order knowingly and voluntarily
initiated contact with the defendant for the purpose of reconciliation of a marriage
or restoration of the relationship.
(b) The defendant did not initiate the contact in violation of the protective
order.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2056 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1025
(c) The contact occurred with the express request, invitation, or consent of
the person protected by the protective order.
(2) The affirmative defense provided in this Section does not apply if the
defendant used force, threats, coercion, or intimidation to obtain the protected
person's consent or participation.